Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Water  Resources Commission, after providing opportunity for public
notice and comment, may approve a charter  to establish a Deschutes River water bank pilot
program for surface water. Before approving the charter, the commission must  find that the
charter:
(a) Is approved by the Confederated Tribes of the Warm Springs; and
(b) Adheres to the requirements for a water bank charter described in  subsection (3) of
this section.
(2) The persons and entities that  are eligible to participate in a water bank described in
subsection (1) of this section are:
(a) Water rights holders that divert surface water from the  Deschutes River, including
irrigation districts.
(b) The Confederated Tribes of the Warm Springs.
(c) Cities in central Oregon.
(d) Public utilities, as defined in ORS 757.005, and domestic water supply districts organ-
ized under ORS chapter 264 that:
Enrolled House Bill 3806 (HB 3806-B) Page 1
(A) Supply water to cities in central Oregon; and
(B) Provide water to at least 2,000 water service connections.
(e) The Deschutes River Conservancy.
(3) A water bank charter must include:
(a) A  description of the geographic area for water bank operations, which must be limited
to the Deschutes River above  Lake Billy Chinook and areas that may be served by the water
bank by points of diversion from the Deschutes River.
(b) Identification of, and signatures from authorized representatives  of, the participants.
(c) An agreement that the Deschutes River Conservancy will manage the operations of
the water bank, in coordination with the participants.
(d) A requirement that water described in subsection (4)  of this section be dedicated to
legally protected in-stream flows as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(e) A requirement that the  participants depositing water into or receiving water from the
water bank have measured water  use and reported the measurements to the Water Re-
sources Department for the past five years.
(f) A requirement that the operations of the water bank may not:
(A) Injure existing water rights, unless the  holder of the right has signed a forbearance
agreement.
(B) Reduce the surface flow of state scenic waterways.
(C) Except as provided in section 4 of this 2025 Act, enlarge existing water rights.
(D) Result in a total number of irrigated acres that is  greater than the acreage author-
ized under a person’s or entity’s existing water rights for irrigation.
(E) Deposit water from or provide water to existing water rights that:
(i) Are not a water use subject to transfer, as defined in ORS 540.505; and
(ii) Have  not been beneficially used in the past five years or are otherwise subject to
forfeiture.
(g) A description of how the water bank will ensure that uses are consistent  with basin
plans or rules of the commission.
(h) A description of how water rights will be vetted for inclusion in the water bank,  in-
cluding how the water rights will satisfy the requirements of paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(i) A description of how  the participants depositing water into or receiving water from
the water bank will manage water in coordination with the department.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3)(d) of this section, the following  shall be dedicated to
legally protected in-stream flows:
(a) Twenty-five percent of the volume of water loaned to the  water bank as a result of
the fallowing of acres during all or part of an irrigation season, which must be protected by
an in-stream lease during the irrigation season.
(b) Water withdrawn by the North Unit Irrigation District as  a result of water loaned to
the water bank from on-farm activities, other than the fallowing of acres during  the irri-
gation season, which shall be  protected in an amount equal to 100 percent of the withdrawn
value. The protection in-stream shall be by  an in-stream lease or a limited license for flow
augmentation for winter release from Wickiup Reservoir into the Deschutes River.
(c) Any surface  water loaned to the water bank that is more than the surface water
transacted for out-of-stream use, which must be protected by an in-stream lease  during the
irrigation season.
(d) Water deposited into  the water bank solely for in-stream purposes and protected by
an in-stream lease during the irrigation season.
(5) Operational water and water from district  conveyance losses are not eligible for de-
posit into the water bank.
(6) A water bank approved under this section must be operated in  accordance with
sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3806 (HB 3806-B) Page 2
SECTION 2. (1) On or before January 1 of each  year, the Deschutes River Conservancy
may submit a proposed annual operating plan for a water bank approved under  section 1 of
this 2025 Act to the Water Resources Department.
(2) A  water bank described in section 1 of this 2025 Act may operate only under an annual
operating plan that is approved in writing by the Water Resources Department on or before
March 1 of each year in which the water bank operates.
(3) Before  approving a proposed annual operating plan, the Water Resources Department
shall make the proposed plan available for public comment on whether the  proposed plan
meets the standards described in subsection (5) of this section.
(4) The Water Resources Department shall seek comments on the  proposed annual op-
erating plan from the State Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Confederated Tribes of
the Warm Springs. If the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife or the Confederated Tribes
of the Warm Springs raise any objections to the proposed  plan, the Deschutes River
Conservancy shall amend the proposed  plan to resolve the objections. The Water Resources
Department may not approve the proposed plan unless the objections are resolved.
(5) A proposed annual operating plan must:
(a) Include the report described in section 6 of this 2025 Act.
(b) Describe the following activities:
(A) How surface water supply will be made  available to loan to the water bank that is
subject to the annual operating plan.
(B) How surface water deposited in the water bank that is subject to  the annual operat-
ing plan may be withdrawn from the water bank and used.
(6) The participants in a water bank may loan or withdraw surface water during an irri-
gation season only as described under to subsection (5)(b) of this section.
(7) The department may not approve a proposed annual operating plan under this section
if the department determines that, for the year to which the  proposed plan applies, there are
not sufficient resources available to the department, from any source,  to allow the depart-
ment to carry out the department’s duties under sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) In lieu of submitting individual leases  and temporary transfer or
forbearance agreements, not less than 30 days before the start of an irrigation  season, a
water bank approved under section 1 of this 2025 Act may submit a consolidated lease and
temporary forbearance transfer of water application to the Water Resources Department.
(2)(a) Each application may not contain more than one irrigation water right, which must
have a priority date before  January 1, 1906. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this sub-
section, each application shall identify no more than one stream reach  and one point of di-
version to which the deposited water may be distributed.
(b) The water bank may submit a single application for  the North Unit Irrigation District
to receive water  at two points of diversion. However, the department may require separate
applications for separate priority dates.
(3) The water bank shall submit the application  in the form and manner prescribed by
the department. The application must include:
(a) The location and number of acres  fallowed for the full irrigation season from which
surface water irrigation will be removed to be deposited into the water bank,  the associated
point of diversion, the amount of water associated with the acres and point  of diversion
measured in acre-feet and cubic feet  per second, and the total amount of water to be reduced
at the point of diversion.
(b) The point of diversion, or if the  recipient is the North Unit Irrigation District, the
points of diversion, from which water deposited into the water  bank will be withdrawn and
the quantity of  water, measured in acre-feet and cubic feet per second, needed to fulfill a
supply shortage of an existing irrigation water right within a district.
Enrolled House Bill 3806 (HB 3806-B) Page 3
(c) The amount of  water, measured in acre-feet and cubic feet per second, to be dedicated
to in-stream  use as an in-stream lease, the months of use and the location of the applicable
water gage.
(d) A forbearance agreement for all water rights with points  of diversion that consent
to potential injury and to bypass water.
(e) A map that meets the requirements established by the department.
(f) Any other information required by the department.
(4) A watermaster shall integrate transactions of a  water bank described in this section
into management operations for the irrigation season if the department finds that:
(a) Acres deposited into the water bank are fallowed.
(b) The transaction meets the requirements for water bank operations  described in sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) The water bank shall post the application described in this section on a publicly
available website of the water bank.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “District” has the meaning given that term in ORS 545.002.
(b) “Water use subject to transfer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 540.505.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 537.348, the Water  Resources Department may approve an ap-
plication by a water bank approved under  section 1 of this 2025 Act for a district that is
withdrawing water from the Deschutes River above Lake Billy Chinook to engage in  splitting
the rate and duty of the water right between a  district’s existing irrigation water right and
another district’s existing irrigation water right or an in-stream water right  or in-stream
lease, if the application demonstrates that:
(a) Regardless of the duty on the water right,  the duty to be split will not exceed 4.2
acre-feet per acre;
(b) The water bank has measurements of the on-farm water delivered, as  measured by
a totalizing flow meter and reported to the water bank, and has agreed to submit information
to the watermaster upon request;
(c) The application includes  a forbearance agreement for all water rights with points of
diversion that consent to potential injury and to bypass water; and
(d) The transactions meet  the requirements for water bank operations described in sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) In reviewing an application under subsection (2) of this section, the department:
(a) Shall publish notice of  the application in the weekly public notice published by the
department and accept any allegations of  injury for at least 21 days after publication of the
notice.
(b) When evaluating enlargement, may not consider whether the lease will:
(A) Fail to keep the existing place of use from receiving water; or
(B) Increase the acres irrigated under the water right, so  long as there is no increase in
water use and  no expansion of irrigated acres under the depositing district’s water rights
or the receiving district’s water rights.
(4) The terms of a transfer under this section must provide that, during the  term of the
transfer:
(a) The districts:
(A) May not increase  the number of acres that are irrigated within the depositing district
or the receiving district;
(B) May not increase the districts’ use of  supplemental water rights or storage water
rights;
(C) Shall continue to provide access to the watermaster to measure  the districts’ water
use, as needed above, below and at the point of diversion or points of  rediversion and provide
the measurements to the department in real time, to the satisfaction of the watermaster;
Enrolled House Bill 3806 (HB 3806-B) Page 4
(D) Shall measure water use at the point of delivery and report the measurements  to the
Deschutes River Conservancy; and
(E) Shall, in coordination with the Deschutes River Conservancy, arrange for:
(i) A secondary water right to  release water from storage outside of the irrigation sea-
son; or
(ii) A limited  license for flow augmentation or an in-stream lease in the amount of water
subject to the forbearance agreement.
(b) The Deschutes River Conservancy  shall provide the measurements reported to the
conservancy under paragraph (a)(D) of this subsection to the watermaster, upon request.
(5) The parties to a transfer under this section may establish  additional requirements for
a transfer under this section, which must be set forth in the water  bank’s operating plan
under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) A water bank approved under section 1 of this 2025  Act may not operate
during a calendar year if, prior to March 1 of the calendar year, participants  in the water
bank have not committed to a minimum of 1,800 acres of water rights to be  leased under
ORS 537.348.
(2) Acres that, on or after the effective  date of this 2025 Act, are permanently converted
to an in-stream water right under ORS 537.348 by a participant in the water bank may count
toward the minimum number of acres described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) At the time that a proposed  annual operating plan is submitted under section 2 of this
2025 Act, the participants may agree to increase  the acres protected by a lease under ORS
537.348 to  a number of acres that is higher than the minimum described in subsection (1) of
this section.
(4) A deposit of water into the water bank as a result of transactions approved under
section 3 or 4 of this 2025 Act shall constitute beneficial use for purposes of ORS  540.610 for
the duration of the deposit.
(5) If the Water Resources Department  determines that a transaction approved under
section 3 or 4 of  this 2025 Act would result in an injury to an existing water right, and a
forbearance agreement applicable to the water right that was required under section 3  or 4
of this 2025 Act has not been entered into, the department may,  after consultation with the
water bank:
(a) Allow the injured party  to take water made available to the water bank to satisfy the
injured party’s water right and debit those amounts from water bank transactions; or
(b) Terminate the  transaction and prohibit use of the previously transferred water right
during the irrigation season in which the transaction was terminated.
(6) If the Water Resources Department determines, alone or in consultation  with the
participants, the Confederated  Tribes of the Warm Springs or the State Department of Fish
and Wildlife, that operations of the water bank are causing  injury to an existing water right
or reducing the surface water flow of a scenic waterway, the Water Resources Department
shall require the operations that are causing the injury or reduction in surface water  flow
to cease.
(7) The operations of a water bank may not result in an increase in:
(a) The use of water within the geographic area of the water bank during a calendar year.
(b) The diversion of surface water within the geographic area of the water bank.
(c) The number of acres  within the geographic area of the water bank that are irrigated.
(8) A water bank shall submit to the department any transactions to be protected or
implemented by the department, including any transactions described in section 3 or 4 of this
2025 Act.
(9) If the participants in a water bank do not adhere to all applicable requirements,  the
department shall deactivate the water bank.
Enrolled House Bill 3806 (HB 3806-B) Page 5
(10) A water bank that is deactivated as described  in subsection (9) of this section must
submit a new charter as  described in section 1 of this 2025 Act and receive approval for the
new charter before resuming operations.
SECTION 6. (1) On or before January 1 of each year, a water bank  approved under sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act shall submit a  report to the Water Resources Department that sum-
marizes the activities of the water bank during the previous irrigation season.
(2) The report must describe in-stream flow benefits, including, at a minimum:
(a) A description of how 25 percent of the volume of water  loaned to the water bank due
to the fallowing of acres during all or part of an irrigation season was legally  protected
through an in-stream lease.
(b) A description of how all water loaned to the water bank that was available for reasons
other than the  fallowing of acres was associated with an equal amount of water released
from the Wickiup Reservoir and legally protected by an in-stream lease  or limited license for
flow augmentation in the Deschutes River during the  winter following the loan of the water.
(3) After submitting the report, the water bank shall make  all records of water rights
and monitoring information associated with  operations of the water bank available to the
department for an assessment, upon the request of the department.
SECTION 7.
The Water Resources Department  may enter into agreements and accept
moneys from any public or private source to carry out the purposes of sections 1 to 7 of  this
2025 Act.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter , Oregon Laws  2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5543),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal
funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in
section 3, chapter , Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5543), collected or re-
ceived by  the Water Resources Department for field services, is increased by $216,394, for
the Deschutes River water bank program.
SECTION 9. Sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2034.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3806 (HB 3806-B) Page 6